Maine, session 132, LD1222.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §8102, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. School administrative unit. "School administrative unit" has the same meaning
as in Title 20-A, section 1, subsection 26.
Sec. 2. 14 MRSA §8102, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. School superintendent. "School superintendent" has the same meaning as in
Title 20-A, section 1, subsection 39.
Sec. 3. 14 MRSA §8104-A, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. School administrative units and school superintendents. A school administrative
unit or school superintendent is liable for conduct under section 8104-E, subsection 1.
Sec. 4. 14 MRSA §8104-B, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2005, c. 448, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Performing discretionary function. Performing or failing to perform a
discretionary function or duty, whether or not the discretion is abused and whether or not
any statute, charter, ordinance, order, resolution or policy under which the discretionary
function or duty is performed is valid or invalid, except that if the discretionary function
involves the operation of a motor vehicle, as defined in Title 29‑A, section 101, subsection
42, this section does not provide immunity for the governmental entity for an employee's
negligent operation of the motor vehicle resulting in a collision, regardless of whether the
employee has immunity under this chapter, and except that this section does not provide
immunity for conduct under section 8104-E, subsection 1, paragraph E;
Sec. 5. 14 MRSA §8104-E is enacted to read:
§8104-E. School administrative units and school superintendents
1. Limited immunity for school administrative units and school superintendents.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 8103, this chapter does not apply to claims
against a school administrative unit or a school superintendent for certain conduct,
including:
A. A discretionary policy decision involving gross negligence or willful misconduct;
B. An act of negligence;
C. A violation of state or federal education law;
D. Failure to ensure student safety, including:
(1) Physical harm suffered by a student;
(2) Abuse inflicted by a student;
(3) Discrimination directed at a student; or
(4) Failure to report misconduct;
E. Failure to report abuse of, neglect of or threats to a student under subsection 4;
F. Willful misconduct; or
G. Criminal activity.
Page 1 - 132LR1618(01)

2. Notice required. An action for conduct under subsection 1, paragraphs A to G may
not be filed unless the plaintiff has provided written notice to the school administrative unit
or school superintendent at least 60 days prior to filing the complaint. The school
administrative unit or school superintendent may investigate or resolve the matter through
mediation or administrative review during the notice period under this subsection.
3. School employees and staff. This section does not apply to school employees or
staff, including teachers, acting within the course and scope of employment for the school
administrative unit, except in cases of gross negligence, willful misconduct or criminal
activity. A school administrative unit shall indemnify all staff and employees for a claim
arising out of an act by a school administrative unit staff member or employee performing
an official duty.
4. Mandatory reporting. Each school administrative unit shall establish, publish and
enforce a mandatory reporting policy regarding student safety concerns. Failure to report
abuse of, neglect of or threats to a student is a ground for legal action under subsection 1,
paragraph E.
5. Liability insurance. A school administrative unit shall maintain liability insurance
coverage sufficient to cover a potential claim involving conduct under subsection 1,
paragraphs A to G. The Department of Education may establish a fund or provide other
financial support to a school administrative unit carry to out the purposes of this subsection.
6. Report. Beginning October 1, 2027, the Department of Education shall submit an
annual report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
education matters on the impact and effectiveness of this section.
Sec. 6. Effective date. This Act takes effect October 1, 2026.